North Carolina, session 2025, HB1000.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article 1N of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes reads as rewritten:
"Article 1N.
"Gender Transition Procedures on Minors.Minors and Detransitioner Bill of Rights.
"§ 90-21.150. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
…
(2a) Department. – The Department of Health and Human Services.
(2b) Detransitioner. – An individual who (i) began or completed a gender transition
procedure but later sought treatment to reverse the effects of the surgical
gender transition procedure or regimen of cross-sex hormones or
puberty-blocking drugs due to the resolution of any inconsistency between the
individual's sex and individual's perceived sex or perceived gender or (ii) has
ceased the surgical gender transition procedure or regimen of cross-sex
hormones or puberty-blocking drugs due to the resolution of any
inconsistency between the individual's sex and the individual's perceived sex
or perceived gender.
(2c) Detransition procedure. – Any treatment, including mental health treatment,
medical interventions, and surgeries that (i) stop or reverse the effects of a
prior surgical gender transition procedure or regimen of cross-sex hormones
or puberty-blocking drugs due to the resolution of any inconsistency between
the individual's sex and the individual's perceived sex or perceived gender or
(ii) help an individual cope with the effects of a prior surgical gender transition
procedure or regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs after
the resolution of any inconsistency between the individual's sex and the
individual's perceived sex or perceived gender.
(2d) Female. – An individual who has, had, will have, or would have but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for
fertilization.
(3) Gender. – The psychological, behavioral, social, and cultural aspects of being
male or female.
*H1000-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3a) Gender clinic. – A health care entity that provides or prescribes gender
transition procedures or refers individuals for surgical gender transition
procedures or the dispensing of puberty-blocking drugs or cross-sex
hormones.
…
(6a) Male. – An individual who has, had, will have, or would have but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for
fertilization.
…
"§ 90-21.151. Limitations on detransition procedures and gender transition procedures.
It shall be unlawful for a medical professional to perform a detransition procedure, surgical
gender transition procedure on a minor or to prescribe, provide, or dispense puberty-blocking
drugs or cross-sex hormones to a minor.
"§ 90-21.152. When certain procedures are permitted.
(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 90-21.151, and provided the minor's parents or guardians give
informed consent, a medical professional shall not be prohibited from providing any of the
following procedures to a minor:
…
(7) A detransition procedure.
…
"§ 90-21.153. Penalties.
(a) A violation of any of the provisions of this Article by a medical professional shall be
considered unprofessional conduct and shall result in the revocation of the medical professional's
license to practice.practice for a minimum of one year.
(b) An entity that employs or contracts with a medical professional who violates any of
the provisions of this Article shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty
thousand dollars ($250,000).
"§ 90-21.154. Civil remedies.
(a) Any (i) medical professional who performs a surgical gender transition procedure on
a minor or who prescribes, provides, or dispenses puberty-blocking drugs or cross-sex hormones
to a minor and (ii) entity that employs or contracts with a medical professional who performs a
surgical gender transition procedure on a minor or who prescribes, provides, or dispenses
puberty-blocking drugs or cross-sex hormones to a minor shall be strictly liable to the minor for
any physical, psychological, emotional, or physiological harms the minor suffers as a result of
the surgical gender transition procedure, puberty-blocking drugs, or cross-sex hormones.
(a1) Any individual who undergoes a detransition procedure may bring a civil action either
within 10 years from the day the person reaches 18 years of age or within four years from the
time the cost of a detransition procedure is incurred, whichever date is later, against a medical
professional in a court of competent jurisdiction.
(b) A minor who suffers an injury described in subsection (a) subsections (a) and (a1) of
this section, or a parent or guardian of a minor who suffers an injury described in subsection (a)
subsections (a) and (a1) of this section, may bring a civil action within the latter of 25 10 years
from the day the minor reaches 18 years of age or four years from the time of discovery by the
injured party of both the injury and the causal relationship between the treatment and the injury
against the offending medical professional or entity. If the minor who suffered any injury
described in subsection (a) subsections (a) and (a1) of this section is under a legal disability upon
attaining 18 years of age, the time limitation in this subsection does not begin to run until that
legal disability is removed. An individual commencing an action under this section may seek the
following relief:
(1) Declaratory or injunctive relief.
Page 2 House Bill 1000-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Compensatory damages, including pain and suffering, loss of reputation, loss
of income, and loss of consortium, which includes the loss of expectation of
sharing parenthood.
(3) Punitive damages.
(4) Attorneys' fees and court costs.
(5) Any other appropriate relief.
(6) Costs associated with a subsequent detransition procedure.
(c) Minors bringing an action under this section may do so through a parent or guardian
prior to attaining majority and may do so in their own name after attaining majority.
Notwithstanding G.S. 143-299, any action brought under this section may be commenced within
the time frames described in subsection (b) of this section.
(d) G.S. 90-21.19(a) shall not apply to damages awarded in an action brought under this
section.
(e) Medical professionals and entities employing or contracting with medical
professionals may not seek a contractual waiver of the liability imposed under this section. Any
attempted waiver is null and void.
"§ 90-21.155. Right to public transparency.
(a) Any gender clinic operating in the State must provide a report of statistics regarding
all surgical gender transition procedures and prescribed regimens of cross-sex hormones or
puberty-blocking drugs to patients to the Department.
(b) The Department shall develop a form for this purpose and determine the statistics to
be reported, which must include the following:
(1) The date on which the surgical gender transition procedure or prescribed
regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs was prescribed or
the referral was made for either.
(2) The age and sex of the person to whom the surgical gender transition
procedure or prescribed regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking
drugs was prescribed or for whom the referral was made for either.
(3) For any cross-sex hormone or puberty-blocking drug prescribed as part of a
gender transition, (i) the name of the drug or hormone, (ii) the dosage, (iii) the
dosage frequency and duration, and (iv) the method by which the drug will be
administered.
(4) For any surgical gender transition procedure, the type of surgical procedure,
identified by current procedural terminology code.
(5) The state and county of residence of the person receiving the surgical gender
transition procedure or regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking
drugs.
(6) The name, contact information, and medical specialty of the medical
professional who prescribed the (i) surgical gender transition procedure or (ii)
regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs or made the referral
for either.
(7) If applicable, a description of any other neurological, behavioral, or mental
health conditions that the person has been diagnosed with or exhibits
symptoms of, including autism spectrum disorder, depressions, anxiety, or
bipolar disorder.
(c) A form shall be completed by each gender clinic that prescribes or performs a surgical
gender transition procedure or regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs that is
signed by the medical professional who prescribes the surgical gender transition procedure or
regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs or makes a referral for either.
(d) Each form shall be transmitted by the gender clinic to the Department within 15 days
after the end of the calendar month during which the surgical gender transition procedure or
House Bill 1000-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
regimen of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs was prescribed or the referral was
made for either.
"§ 90-21.156. Local limitations.
(a) No city or county may prohibit the provision of mental health services or therapy to
help a minor address an inconsistency between the minor's biological sex and the minor's
perceived gender or perceived biological sex.
(b) No city or county may prohibit a parent or legal guardian from consenting to, or
withholding consent from, the provision of mental health services or therapy to help a minor
address an inconsistency between the minor's biological sex and the minor's perceived gender or
perceived biological sex.
"§ 90-21.157. Enforcement.
The Attorney General may investigate any complaints received alleging violation of this
Article. If the Attorney General finds that there has been a violation of this Article, the Attorney
General may bring an action to impose civil penalties and to seek any other appropriate relief
under this Article. Any clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed in actions instituted by the
Attorney General shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2.
"§ 90-21.158. Reporting.
On November 1 of each year, the Department shall submit an annual report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services that compiles the data required
to be collected under this Article into a comprehensive statistical report. Any information in this
report shall not disclose the identity of any person or entity that is the subject of any report. The
Department shall also publish the report on a publicly available website."
SECTION 2.(a) Article 3 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 58-3-257. Detransition procedure coverage.
(a) The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Detransition procedure. – As defined in G.S. 90-21.150.
(2) Female. – An individual who has, had, will have, or would have but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for
fertilization.
(3) Gender. – The psychological, behavioral, social, and cultural aspects of being
male or female.
(4) Gender transition procedure. – Any pharmaceutical or surgical intervention to
alter an individual's body as a treatment to address an inconsistency between
the individual's sex and the individual's perceived gender or perceived sex.
(5) Male. – An individual who has, had, will have, or would have but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive
system that at some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for
fertilization.
(6) Minor. – An individual who is younger than 18 years of age.
(7) Perceived sex. – An individual's internal sense of his or her sex.
(8) Perceived gender. – An individual's internal sense of his or her gender.
(9) Sex. – The biological indication of male and female in the context of
reproductive potential or capacity, including sex chromosomes, naturally
occurring sex hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal and external
genitalia present at birth, including secondary sex characteristics, without
regard to an individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience of
gender.
Page 4 House Bill 1000-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) All health benefit plans that provide coverage for one or more gender transition
procedures for insureds who are minors, including coverage for any applicable related diagnostic,
billing, or CPT code, shall also provide coverage for all of the following:
(1) All possible adverse consequences related to the gender transition procedure,
including both short-term and long-term side effects of the procedure.
(2) Testing and screening necessary to monitor the mental health and physical
health of any insured on no less than an annual basis and without regard to the
sex designation on the insured's medical record.
(3) Any procedure or treatment, including therapy, necessary to manage, reverse,
or recover from the insured's previous gender transition procedure.
(c) Coverage required under this section shall be provided to all insureds that underwent
a gender transition procedure as a minor regardless of whether that gender transition procedure
occurred when the individual was not insured under the current health benefit plan.
(d) On at least an annual basis, an insurer offering one or more health benefit plans that
provide coverage for gender transition or detransition procedures shall provide the following
information, if known, to the Commissioner and the Secretary of the Department of Health and
Human Services in a manner determined by the Commissioner or the Secretary and that contains
no protected health information nor personally identifiable information:
(1) The number of claims made for a gender transition or detransition procedure.
(2) The age and sex of the individuals for whom a gender transition or detransition
procedure claim is submitted.
(3) The date that the individual for whom a detransition procedure claim is
submitted initially began a prior gender transition procedure.
(4) The county of residence of the person for whom the gender transition or
detransition procedure claim is submitted.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an insurer to provide any coverage
for gender transition procedures."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
insurance contracts issued, renewed, or amended on or after that date.
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 130A-118 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-118. Amendment of birth and death certificates.
…
(b) A new certificate of birth shall be made by the State Registrar when:if any of the
following conditions are met:
(1) Proof is submitted to the State Registrar that the previously unwed parents of
a person have intermarried subsequent to the birth of the person;person.
(2) Notification is received by the State Registrar from the clerk of a court of
competent jurisdiction of a judgment, order or decree disclosing different or
additional information relating to the parentage of a person;person.
(3) Satisfactory proof is submitted to the State Registrar that there has been
entered in a court of competent jurisdiction a judgment, order or decree
disclosing different or additional information relating to the parentage of a
person; orperson.
…
(5) A written request from an individual is received by the State Registrar to
change the sex on that individual's birth record because the person is a
destransitioner, if the request is accompanied by a notarized statement from a
physician licensed to practice medicine who can certify that the person has
undergone a detransition procedure, as defined in Article 1N of Chapter 90 of
the General Statutes."
SECTION 3.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
House Bill 1000-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.(a) Part 1 of Article 1A of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 90-21.5A. Limited access to records.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no medical professional
shall deny a parent or legal guardian access to the medical records or medical information of the
parent's or legal guardian's minor, except in the following circumstances:
(1) The medical records or medical information relate to harm resulting from
abuse, neglect, or domestic violence.
(2) The person denying access reasonably believes (i) the parent or legal guardian
is responsible for the abuse, neglect, or other injury resulting from domestic
violence or (ii) that informing the parent or legal guardian would not be in the
best interest of the minor.
(b) For the purposes of this section, the term "abuse, neglect, or domestic violence" does
not include any of the following:
(1) A parent's or legal guardian's refusal to permit the parent's or legal guardian's
minor to seek a surgical gender transition procedure or regimen of cross-sex
hormones or puberty-blocking drugs, as those terms are defined in Article 1N
of this Chapter, in violation of that Article.
(2) A parent's or legal guardian's refusal to address the parent's or legal guardian's
minor using pronouns that are inconsistent with the minor's sex.
(c) A parent or legal guardian who is denied access to medical records or medical
information in violation of this section shall have a private cause of action for damages and
equitable relief as the court may determine is justified. The court may also award reasonable
attorneys' fees and court costs to a prevailing party.
(d) The Attorney General may investigate a potential violation of this section, seek
production of documentation or testimony through a civil investigative demand, and bring an
action to enforce compliance with this section."
SECTION 4.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law.
SECTION 5. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective October 1,
2025.
Page 6 House Bill 1000-First Edition